New Jersey, session 222, S3892.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Commissioner of Health, in collaboration with the Attorney General, shall develop, prepare, and produce pamphlets and signs containing and displaying information relating to the Victims of Crime Compensation Office. b.    The pamphlets and signs shall be clearly written and readily comprehensible, and shall provide information concerning: (1)   the services and benefits offered by the Victims of Crime Compensation Office; (2)   contact information for the Victims of Crime Compensation Office; and (3)   the procedures for filing a victims compensation claim. c.     In every emergency department of a general hospital, and in every satellite emergency department licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), the Commissioner of Health shall require pamphlets to be distributed to victims of crime and signs to be posted in conspicuous locations, as necessary. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment.